sk-SK: Typ hydratačného ventilu: Hryzací ventil; Pákový ventil on/off; Zatláčací/vyťahovací ventil; Rýchloupínací ventil; Samotesniaci ventil; Prietokový ventil; Otočný ventil; Iné
th: ประเภทวาล์วน้ำ: วาล์วแบบกัด; วาล์วเปิด/ปิดแบบคันโยก; วาล์วแบบดึง-ดัน; วาล์วแบบปลดเร็ว; วาล์วซีลปิดเอง; วาล์วพ่นน้ำ; วาล์วแบบบิดล็อก; อื่นๆ
ko: 수분 공급 밸브 유형: 바이트 밸브; 온/오프 레버 밸브; 푸시풀 밸브; 퀵 릴리스 밸브; 자동 밀봉 밸브; 서지 밸브; 트위스트 잠금 밸브; 기타
lt-LT: Hidratacijos vožtuvo tipas: Sukandamas vožtuvas; Svirtinis įjungimo / išjungimo vožtuvas; Traukiamasis ir spaudžiamasis vožtuvas; Greitai atjungiamas vožtuvas; Savaime užsidarantis vožtuvas; Aukšto slėgio vožtuvas; Pasukamas vožtuvas; Kita
ja: ハイドレーションバルブタイプ: バイトバルブ; オン/オフレバーバルブ; プッシュプルバルブ; クイックリリースバルブ; セルフシーリングバルブ; サージバルブ; ツイストロックバルブ; その他
nb: Type drikkeventil: Biteventil; Av/på-spakeventil; Skyv/trekk-ventil; Hurtigkoblingsventil; Selvforseglende ventil; Surge-ventil; Vrilåsventil; Annet
sv: Typ av vätskeventil: Bitventil; Spakventil (på/av); Drag/tryckventil; Snabbventil; Självtätande ventil; Surge-ventil; Vridventil; Övrigt
fr: Type de valve d’hydratation: Valve à mordre; Valve à levier marche/arrêt; Valve à pousser-tirer; Valve à détachement rapide; Valve auto-obturante; Valve à haut débit; Valve à verrouillage rotatif; Autre
de: Typ des Trinkventils: Beißventil; Ein-/Aus-Hebelventil; Push-Pull-Ventil; Schnellverschluss-Ventil; Selbstschließendes Ventil; Surge-Ventil; Drehverschluss-Ventil; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di valvola per l'idratazione: Valvola a morso; Valvola con leva on/off; Valvola push-pull; Valvola a sgancio rapido; Valvola autosigillante; Valvola a flusso rapido; Valvola twist-lock; Altro
es: Tipo de válvula de hidratación: Válvula de mordida; Válvula de palanca de encendido/apagado; Válvula push-pull; Válvula de liberación rápida; Válvula autosellante; Válvula de sobrepresión; Válvula giratoria; Otra
fi: Nesteytysventtiilin tyyppi: Puruventtiili; On/off-vipuventtiili; Työnnettävä/vedettävä venttiili; Pikalukkoventtiili; Itsestään sulkeutuva venttiili; Virtauksensäätöventtiili; Kääntölukkoventtiili; Muu
zh-TW: 飲水閥類型: 咬嘴閥; 開/關推拉閥; 推拉閥; 快拆閥; 自封閥; 大流量水閥; 旋鎖閥; 其他
vi: Loại van đựng nước: Van cắn; Van gạt bật/tắt; Van kéo-đẩy; Van tháo lắp nhanh; Van tự niêm phong; Van phun; Van khóa xoay; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta hidracijskega ventila: Ugrizni ventil; Ročni ventil (vklop/izklop); Potezni ventil; Hitro snemljiv ventil; Samotesnilni ventil; Ventil z visokim pretokom; Ventil z vrtljivim zaklepom; Drugo
ru: Тип клапана гидратора: Закусываемый клапан; Клапан с рычажком вкл/выкл; Выдвижной клапан; Быстроразъемный клапан; Самозапирающийся клапан; Клапан Surge; Поворотный клапан-фиксатор; Другое
tr: Hidrasyon valfi tipi: Isırma valfi; Açma/kapama kollu valf; Bas-çek valf; Hızlı çıkarılabilir valf; Kendinden kapanan valf; Yüksek debili valf; Çevirmeli kilit valfi; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul de valvă de hidratare: Supapă cu mușcare; Supapă cu levier pornit/oprit; Supapă push-pull; Supapă cu eliberare rapidă; Supapă cu auto-etanșare; Supapă de flux mare; Supapă cu blocare prin răsucire; Altele
bg-BG: Тип клапан за хидратация: Клапа за захапване; Клапа с лостче за включване/изключване; Push-pull клапа; Клапа за бързо освобождаване; Самоспираща клапа; Surge клапа; Клапа със завъртане; Други
cs: Typ hydratačního ventilu: Skusový ventil; Páčkový ventil (on/off); Vytahovací ventil; Rychloupínací ventil; Samouzavírací ventil; Průtokový ventil; Otočný ventil s pojistkou; Ostatní
pl: Typ zaworu hydracyjnego: Ustnik zgryzowy; Zawór on/off z dźwignią; Ustnik push-pull; Zawór z szybkozłączką; Zawór samouszczelniający; Zawór o wysokim przepływie; Zawór obrotowy; Inne
nl: Drinkventiel type: Bijtventiel; Aan-uit-hefboomventiel; Trek-duw-ventiel; Quick-release-ventiel; Zelfsluitend ventiel; Surge-ventiel; Twist-lock-ventiel; Overig
el: Τύπος βαλβίδας ενυδάτωσης: Βαλβίδα δαγκώματος; Βαλβίδα on/off με μοχλό; Βαλβίδα πίεσης/έλξης; Βαλβίδα ταχείας απελευθέρωσης; Αυτοσφραγιζόμενη βαλβίδα; Βαλβίδα υψηλής ροής (surge valve); Βαλβίδα περιστροφικής ασφάλισης; Άλλο
da: Ventiltype til væskesystem: Bideventil; Tænd/sluk-håndtagsventil; Push-pull-ventil; Quick-release-ventil; Selvlukkende ventil; Surge-ventil; Drejelåsventil; Andet
pt-BR: Válvula de hidratação tipo: Válvula de mordida; Válvula com alavanca abre/fecha; Válvula push-pull; Válvula de liberação rápida; Válvula autovedante; Válvula de fluxo rápido; Válvula com trava giratória; Outro
en: Hydration valve type: Bite valve; On/off lever valve; Push-pull valve; Quick-release valve; Self-sealing valve; Surge valve; Twist-lock valve; Other
zh-CN: 水具阀门类型: 咬阀; 开关控制阀; 推拉阀门; 快释阀门; 自密封阀门; 大流量阀; 旋锁阀门; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta hidratacijskog ventila: Ventil za zagriz; Polužni ventil za uključivanje/isključivanje; Push-pull ventil; Brzoodvojivi ventil; Samobrtveni ventil; Ventil za brzi protok; Ventil s okretnim zaključavanjem; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de válvula de hidratação: Válvula de morder; Válvula de alavanca de ligar/desligar; Válvula de empurrar e puxar; Válvula de desengate rápido; Válvula auto-selante; Válvula de pressão; Válvula de bloqueio por torção; Outro
hu: Hidratáló szelep típusa: Harapószelep; Be/ki kapcsoló karos szelep; Kihúzható szelep (push-pull); Gyorskioldós szelep; Önzáró szelep; Surge szelep; Csavaros zárású szelep; Egyéb